Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2404.02
Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program; created; use; reports.

(1) There is created a separate and distinct budgetary program within the commission to be known as the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program. Funding acquired from participation in the federal act, state General Funds, and funding acquired from other sources which may be used for purposes consistent with the Juvenile Services Act and the federal act shall be used to aid in the establishment and provision of community-based services for juveniles who come in contact with the juvenile justice system.

(2)(a) Five percent of the annual General Fund appropriation to the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, excluding administrative budget funds, shall be set aside for the development of a common data set and evaluation of the effectiveness of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program. The intent in creating this common data set is to allow for evaluation of the use of the funds and the effectiveness of the programs or outcomes in the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program.

(b) The common data set shall be developed and maintained by the commission and shall serve as a primary data collection site for any intervention funded by the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program designed to serve juveniles and deter involvement in the formal juvenile justice system. The commission shall work with agencies and programs to enhance existing data sets. To ensure that the data set permits evaluation of recidivism and other measures, the commission shall work with the Office of Probation Administration, juvenile diversion programs, law enforcement, the courts, and others to compile data that demonstrates whether a youth has moved deeper into the juvenile justice system. The University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, may assist with the development of common definitions, variables, and training required for data collection and reporting into the common data set by juvenile justice programs. The common data set maintained by the commission may be provided to the University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute, to assess the effectiveness of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program.

(c) Providing the commission access to records and information for, as well as the commission granting access to records and information from, the common data set is not a violation of confidentiality provisions under any law, rule, or regulation if done in good faith for purposes of evaluation. Records and documents, regardless of physical form, that are obtained or produced or presented to the commission for the common data set are not public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

(d) The five percent of the annual General Fund appropriation to the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, excluding administrative budget funds, shall be appropriated to the commission for development and maintenance of the common data set and for evaluation by an independent evaluator.

(e) The remaining funds in the annual General Fund appropriation to the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program shall be apportioned as aid in accordance with a formula established in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The formula shall be based on the total number of residents per county and federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribe who are twelve years of age through eighteen years of age and other relevant factors as determined by the commission. The commission may require a local match of up to forty percent from the county, multiple counties, federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribe or tribes, or any combination of the three which is receiving aid under such program. Any local expenditures for community-based programs for juveniles may be applied toward such match requirement.

(3)(a) In distributing funds provided under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, aid recipients shall prioritize programs and services that will divert juveniles from the juvenile justice system, reduce the population of juveniles in juvenile detention and secure confinement, and assist in transitioning juveniles from out-of-home placements.

(b) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program shall be used exclusively to assist the aid recipient in the implementation and operation of programs or the provision of services identified in the aid recipient's comprehensive juvenile services plan, including programs for local planning and service coordination; screening, assessment, and evaluation; diversion; alternatives to detention; family support services; treatment services; truancy prevention and intervention programs; pilot projects approved by the commission; payment of transportation costs to and from placements, evaluations, or services; personnel when the personnel are aligned with evidence-based treatment principles, programs, or practices; contracting with other state agencies or private organizations that provide evidence-based treatment or programs; preexisting programs that are aligned with evidence-based practices or best practices; and other services that will positively impact juveniles and families in the juvenile justice system.

(c) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program may be used one time by an aid recipient:

(i) To convert an existing juvenile detention facility or other existing structure for use as an alternative to detention as defined in section 43-245;

(ii) To invest in capital construction, including both new construction and renovations, for a facility for use as an alternative to detention; or

(iii) For the initial lease of a facility for use as an alternative to detention.

(d) Funds received under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program shall not be used for the following:

(i) Construction of secure detention facilities, secure youth treatment facilities, or secure youth confinement facilities;

(ii) Capital construction or the lease or acquisition of facilities beyond the one-time use described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section;

(iii) Programs, services, treatments, evaluations, or other preadjudication services that are not based on or grounded in evidence-based practices, principles, and research, except that the commission may approve pilot projects that authorize the use of such aid; or

(iv) Office equipment, office supplies, or office space.

(e) Any aid not distributed to counties under this subsection shall be retained by the commission to be distributed on a competitive basis under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program for a county, multiple counties, federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribe or tribes, or any combination of the three demonstrating additional need in the funding areas identified in this subsection.

(f) If a county, multiple counties, or a federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribe or tribes is denied aid under this section or receives no aid under this section, the entity may request an appeal pursuant to the appeal process in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The commission shall establish appeal and hearing procedures by December 15, 2014. The commission shall make appeal and hearing procedures available on its website.

(4)(a) Any recipient of aid under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program shall electronically file an annual report as required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. Any program funded through the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program that served juveniles shall report data on the individual youth served. Any program that is not directly serving youth shall include program-level data. In either case, data collected shall include, but not be limited to, the following: The type of juvenile service, how the service met the goals of the comprehensive juvenile services plan, demographic information on the juveniles served, program outcomes, the total number of juveniles served, and the number of juveniles who completed the program or intervention.

(b) Any recipient of aid under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program shall be assisted by the commission in reporting in the common data set, as set forth in the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. Community-based aid utilization and evaluation data shall be stored and maintained by the commission.

(c) Evaluation of the use of funds and the evidence of the effectiveness of the programs shall be completed by the commission, specifically:

(i) The varying rates of recidivism, as defined by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission, and other measures for juveniles participating in community-based programs; and

(ii) Whether juveniles are sent to staff secure or secure juvenile detention after participating in a program funded by the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program.

(5) The commission shall report annually to the Governor and the Legislature on the distribution and use of funds for aid appropriated under the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program. The report shall include, but not be limited to, an aggregate report of the use of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program funds, including the types of juvenile services and programs that were funded, whether any recipients used the funds for a purpose described in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, demographic information on the total number of juveniles served, program success rates, the total number of juveniles sent to secure juvenile detention or residential treatment and secure confinement, and a listing of the expenditures of all counties and federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribes for detention, residential treatment, and secure confinement. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

(6) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program in consultation with the Director of the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program, the Director of Juvenile Diversion Programs, the Office of Probation Administration, the Nebraska Association of County Officials, and the University of Nebraska at Omaha, Juvenile Justice Institute. The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The required elements of a comprehensive juvenile services plan and planning process;

(b) The Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program formula, review process, match requirements, and fund distribution. The distribution process shall ensure a conflict of interest policy;

(c) A distribution process for funds retained under subsection (3) of this section;

(d) A plan for evaluating the effectiveness of plans and programs receiving funding;

(e) A reporting process for aid recipients;

(f) A reporting process for the commission to the Governor and Legislature. The report shall be made electronically to the Governor and the Legislature; and

(g) Requirements regarding the use of the common data set.

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 193, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 54;

Laws 2010, LB800, § 33;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 47;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 48;

Laws 2014, LB464, § 30;

Laws 2015, LB265, § 16;

Laws 2018, LB670, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 136.
July 1, 2026